Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
ELECTRIC SYSTEM PLANS
SECTION 1. Sections 2 to 4 of this 2021 Act are added to  and made a part of ORS chapter
757.
SECTION 2. The Public Utility Commission  shall periodically convene workshops for the
purpose of helping public utilities that provide electricity, municipal electric utilities, people’s
utility districts organized under ORS  chapter 261 that sell electricity, electric cooperatives
organized under ORS chapter 62 and operators of electrical transmission  and distribution
systems to develop and share information  for the identification, adoption and carrying out
of best practices regarding wildfires, including, but not limited to,  risk-based wildfire pro-
tection and risk-based wildfire mitigation procedures and standards.
SECTION 3. (1) A public utility that provides electricity must have and operate in com-
pliance with a risk-based wildfire protection plan that is  filed with the Public Utility Com-
mission and has  been evaluated by the commission. The plan must be based on reasonable
and prudent practices identified through workshops  conducted by the commission pursuant
to section 2 of this 2021 Act  and on commission standards adopted by rule. The public utility
must design the plan in a manner that seeks to protect public safety, reduce risk to  utility
customers and promote electrical system resilience to wildfire damage.
(2) A public utility  that provides electricity shall regularly update a risk-based wildfire
protection plan on a schedule determined by the commission.  The plan must, at a minimum:
(a) Identify areas that are subject to a heightened risk of wildfire and are:
(A) Within the service territory of the public utility; and
(B) Outside the service territory of the public utility  but within a reasonable distance,
as determined by the commission, of the public utility’s generation or transmission assets.
(b) Identify a means for mitigating wildfire risk that reflects a reasonable  balancing of
mitigation costs with the resulting reduction of wildfire risk.
(c) Identify preventive actions and programs that the  public utility will carry out to
minimize the risk of utility facilities causing a wildfire.
Enrolled Senate Bill 762 (SB 762-C) Page 1
(d) After seeking information from regional, state and local entities,  including munici-
palities, identify a protocol for the deenergizing of power lines and  adjusting of power system
operations to mitigate wildfires, promote the safety of the public  and first responders and
preserve health and communication infrastructure.
(e) Describe the procedures, standards and time frames that the  public utility will use
to inspect utility infrastructure in areas that the public utility identifies under paragraph  (a)
of this subsection.
(f) Describe the procedures, standards and time frames that the  public utility will use to
carry out vegetation management in areas that the public  utility identifies under paragraph
(a) of this subsection.
(g) Identify the development, implementation and administration costs for the plan.
(h) Identify the community outreach and  public awareness efforts that the public utility
will use before, during and after a wildfire season.
(3) To develop a plan described in subsection (2) of this section, a public utility  may
consult with and consider information from regional, state and local  entities, including
municipalities.
(4) The commission, in consultation with the State Forestry Department and local
emergency services agencies, shall evaluate a public utility’s wildfire protection plan and plan
updates through a public process.
(5) Not more than 180 days after  receiving a wildfire protection plan or plan update from
a public utility, the commission  shall approve or approve with conditions the plan or update
if the commission  finds that the plan or update is based on reasonable and prudent practices
identified through workshops pursuant to section 2 of this 2021 Act  and designed to meet all
applicable rules and standards adopted by the commission.
(6) The commission’s approval of a wildfire protection plan does  not establish a defense
to any enforcement action for violation of a commission decision, order or  rule or relieve a
public utility  from proactively managing wildfire risk, including by monitoring emerging
practices and technologies.
(7) The commission shall adopt rules for the implementation  of this section. The rules
may include, but need not be limited to, procedures and  standards regarding vegetation
management, public power  safety shutoffs and restorations, pole materials, circuitry and
monitoring systems.
(8) All reasonable  operating costs incurred by, and prudent investments made by, a public
utility to develop, implement or operate a wildfire protection plan under this section  are re-
coverable in the rates of the public utility from all customers through  a filing under ORS
757.210 to 757.220. The commission shall establish an automatic  adjustment clause, as defined
in ORS 757.210, or another method to allow timely recovery of the costs.
SECTION 3a.
(1) In addition to all other penalties  provided by law, violation of section 3
of this 2021 Act or a rule adopted pursuant  to section 3 of this 2021 Act is subject to a civil
penalty not to exceed $10,000.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 183.315 (6), 183.745 (7)(d) and 756.500 to 756.610, civil penalties
under this section must be imposed by the Public Utility  Commission as provided in ORS
183.745.
(3) Civil penalties collected under this section must  be paid into the General Fund and
credited to the Public Utility Commission Account as described in ORS 756.990 (7).
SECTION 4. (1) As used in this section, “consumer-owned utility” and  “governing body”
have the meanings given those terms in ORS 757.600.
(2) A consumer-owned  utility must have and operate in compliance with a risk-based
wildfire mitigation plan approved by the governing body of the  utility. The plan must be de-
signed to protect public safety, reduce risk to utility customers and promote electrical sys-
tem resilience to wildfire damage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 762 (SB 762-C) Page 2
(3) The consumer-owned utility shall regularly update  the risk-based wildfire mitigation
plan on a schedule the governing body deems consistent with prudent utility practices.
(4) A consumer-owned utility shall  conduct a wildfire risk assessment of utility facilities.
The utility shall review  and revise the assessment on a schedule the governing body deems
consistent with prudent utility practices.
(5) A consumer-owned utility  shall submit a copy of the risk-based wildfire mitigation
plan approved by the utility governing body to the Public Utility Commission  to facilitate
commission functions regarding statewide wildfire mitigation  planning and wildfire
preparedness.
SECTION 5. A public utility  that provides electricity shall submit the first risk-based
wildfire protection plan required of the public utility under section 3 of this 2021 Act  for
Public Utility Commission evaluation no later than December 31, 2021.
SECTION 6. A consumer-owned utility shall submit the first risk-based wildfire miti-
gation plan required under section 4  of this 2021 Act to the utility governing body no later
than June 30, 2022.
SECTION 6a. (1) As used in this section, “electric utility” has the meaning given that
term in ORS 757.600.
(2) Sections 3  and 4 of this 2021 Act do not affect the terms or conditions of easement
held by an electric utility over private land as of the effective date of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 6b. Sections 3 and 3a of this 2021 Act do  not apply to municipally owned utili-
ties organized under ORS chapter 225.
STATEWIDE MAP OF WILDFIRE RISK
SECTION 7. (1) The State Forestry Department  shall oversee the development and
maintenance of a comprehensive statewide map of wildfire  risk that displays the wildfire risk
classes described in subsection (4) of this section and populates  the Oregon Wildfire Risk
Explorer.
(2) The Oregon Wildfire Risk Explorer  must be the official wildfire planning and risk
classification mapping tool for the State of Oregon.
(3) The State Board of Forestry shall establish by rule criteria by  which the map must
be developed and maintained, including criteria  concerning the use of the most current
wildfire assessments.
(4) In consultation with Oregon State University, the department shall  establish five
statewide wildfire risk classes of extreme, high, moderate, low and no risk. The classes  must
be:
(a) Consistent with ORS 477.027.
(b) Based on weather, climate, topography and vegetation.
(5) The department shall enter into an agreement with the university that  provides that
the university  will develop and maintain the map and make the map publicly available in
electronic form through the Oregon Wildfire Risk Explorer.
(6) The board shall adopt rules that:
(a) Provide opportunities for public input into the assignment of properties to the wildfire
risk classes described in subsection (4) of this section.
(b) Require the department to provide notice and  information about how a property
owner may appeal an assignment  of the property owner’s property to the extreme or high
wildfire risk classes.
(c) Allow affected property owners and local governments to appeal the  assignment of
properties to the wildfire  risk classes after the map is developed, after any updates to the
map and within a reasonably time after delivery  of the notice and information described in
paragraph (b) of this subsection.
Enrolled Senate Bill 762 (SB 762-C) Page 3
(d) Establish a specific process for appeals through which a  requested change in assign-
ment is assessed based on:
(A) Whether  the assignment is consistent with the criteria described in subsection (3)
of this section;
(B) Any pertinent facts that may justify a change in the assignment; and
(C) Any error in the data the department  used to determine the assignment, if the error
justifies a change in the assignment.
(7) The map must:
(a) Be based on the wildfire risk classes.
(b) Be sufficiently detailed to allow the  assessment of wildfire risk at the property-
ownership level.
(c) Include the boundaries of the wildland-urban interface, as defined in  ORS 477.015,
consistent with national standards.
(d) Include a layer that geospatially displays the locations of socially and economically
vulnerable communities.
(8) To  develop and maintain the map, the university shall collaborate with the depart-
ment, the State Fire Marshal, other state agencies, local governments, federally recognized
Indian tribes in this state,  other public bodies and any other information sources that the
university deems appropriate.
(9) In maintaining the map, the university shall make  technical adjustments as needed
and update the map consistent with the results of appeals described in subsection (6)(b) of
this section.
(10) The university shall provide technical  assistance to representatives of state and local
government, and to landowners, that use the map.
SECTION 7a.
(1) On or before December 31, 2021, the  State Forestry Department shall
report to an interim committee of the Legislative Assembly related to wildfire, in  the man-
ner provided in ORS 192.245, to the State Wildfire Programs Director and to the Wildlife
Programs Advisory Council on the progress of the department and  Oregon State University
in complying with the requirements of section 7 of this 2021 Act.
(2) On or before June 30, 2022, the department and university must  finish all actions re-
quired of the department and university by section 7 of this 2021 Act.
(3) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, the State Board of Forestry may
adopt temporary rules to help ensure the requirements described in subsection  (2) of this
section are met.
DEFENSIBLE SPACE
SECTION 8.
As used in sections 8a, 8b and 8c of this 2021 Act, “defensible space” means
a natural or human-made area in which material capable of supporting the spread  of fire has
been treated, cleared or modified to slow  the rate and intensity of advancing wildfire and
allow space for fire suppression operations to occur.
SECTION 8a. (1) The State Fire  Marshal shall establish minimum defensible space re-
quirements for wildfire risk reduction on lands in areas identified on the statewide map of
wildfire risk described in section 7 of this 2021 Act as within the wildland-urban interface.
(2) The State Fire Marshal:
(a) Shall consult with the Oregon  Fire Code Advisory Board to establish the require-
ments.
(b) Shall establish requirements that are  consistent with and do not exceed the standards
pertaining only to defensible space that are  set forth in the International Wildland-Urban
Interface Code published by the International Code  Council, including the standards per-
taining only to defensible space that are set forth in sections 603 and 604 of the code.
(c) May consider best practices specific to Oregon in  order to establish the requirements.
Enrolled Senate Bill 762 (SB 762-C) Page 4
(d) Shall periodically reexamine the standards set forth in  the International Wildland-
Urban Interface Code and update the requirements to reflect current best practices, in con-
sultation with the Oregon Fire Code Advisory Board.
(e) Shall enforce the requirements that are applicable to  lands within the jurisdiction of
a local government.
(f) Shall adopt rules governing administration of the requirements.
(g) May develop and apply a graduated  fee structure for use in assessing penalties on
property owners for noncompliance with the requirements.
(h) Shall consult on implementation of the requirements.
(i) May  adopt rules concerning reports by local governments described in subsection
(4)(a) of this section.
(3) Subject to additional local requirements, the  requirements shall apply statewide for
all lands in the wildland-urban interface that are designated as extreme or high  risk, as
identified on the map.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, a local government may:
(a) Administer, consult on and enforce the requirements established by the  State Fire
Marshal, within the jurisdiction of the local  government. A local government that adminis-
ters or enforces the requirements established by the State  Fire Marshal shall periodically
report to the State Fire  Marshal regarding compliance with the requirements, including the
extent of compliance for each property within the jurisdiction of the local  government, any
change in the degree of compliance since the last report  and any other information required
by the State Fire Marshal by rule.
(b) Adopt and  enforce local requirements for defensible space that are greater than the
requirements established by the State Fire Marshal. Any local requirements that a  local
government adopts for defensible space must be defensible  space standards selected from the
framework set forth  in the International Wildland-Urban Interface Code or other best prac-
tices specific to Oregon.
(c) Designate local fire districts, fire departments or fire agencies to enforce the re-
quirements established by the State Fire Marshal or the local government pursuant  to par-
agraph (b) of this subsection. A local government that designates enforcement  must comply
with the reporting requirements in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(5) The State  Fire Marshal shall administer a community risk reduction program that
emphasizes education and methods of prevention with respect  to wildfire risk, enforcement
of defensible space requirements, response  planning and community preparedness for
wildfires.
(6) The State Fire Marshal may provide financial, administrative, technical  or other as-
sistance to a local government to facilitate the  administration and enforcement of require-
ments within the jurisdiction of the local government.  A local government shall expend
financial assistance provided by the State Fire Marshal under this subsection to  give priority
to the creation of defensible space:
(a) On lands owned  by members of socially and economically vulnerable communities,
persons with limited proficiency in English and persons of lower income as defined in ORS
456.055.
(b) For critical or emergency infrastructure.
(c) For schools, hospitals and facilities that serve seniors.
SECTION 8b.
(1) The minimum defensible space requirements established by the State
Fire Marshal pursuant to section 8a of this 2021 Act may not be used  as criteria to approve
or deny:
(a) An amendment to a local government’s acknowledged comprehensive plan or  land use
regulations.
(b) A permit, as defined in ORS 215.402 or 227.160.
(c) A limited land use decision, as defined in ORS 197.015.
Enrolled Senate Bill 762 (SB 762-C) Page 5
(d) An expedited land division, as defined in ORS 197.360.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a local government may:
(a) Amend the acknowledged comprehensive plan or land use regulations of the local
government to include the requirements; and
(b) Use the requirements that are included in the amended  acknowledged comprehensive
plan or land use regulations as a criterion for a land use decision.
SECTION 8c.
The State Fire Marshal shall  establish minimum defensible space require-
ments for  wildfire risk reduction on lands in areas identified on the map described in section
7 of this 2021 Act on or before December 31, 2022.
SECTION 9. The Community Risk Reduction Fund is  established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the  General Fund. Interest earned by the Community Risk Re-
duction Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys  in the fund are continuously appropriated
to the State Fire Marshal for the purpose of carrying  out community risk reduction and the
local government financial assistance described in section 8a of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 10. (1) The  State Fire Marshal shall biannually report regarding the status of
State Fire Marshal and local government activities for carrying out section 8a of this  2021
Act to a committee or interim  committee of the Legislative Assembly related to wildfire, in
the manner provided in ORS 192.245, to the State Wildfire Programs Director and  to the
Wildfire Programs Advisory Council:
(a) On or before the  date of convening of the regular session of the Legislative Assembly
as specified in ORS 171.010.
(b) Approximately six months after the date described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) The report shall include, but need not be limited to:
(a) A  status report regarding community risk reduction and the establishment, adminis-
tration and enforcement of defensible space requirements;
(b) The amount  of moneys expended during the year for community risk reduction and
the establishment, administration or enforcement of defensible space requirements;
(c) The amount of moneys expended during the year for the suppression of  fires on
wildland-urban interface lands; and
(d) Any recommendations of the State Fire  Marshal for legislative action, including, but
not limited to, current or future resource and  funding needs for community risk reduction
and establishing, administering or enforcing defensible space requirements.
LAND USE
SECTION 11.
(1) As used in this section, “defensible space” has the  meaning given that
term in section 8 of this 2021 Act.
(2) The Department of  Land Conservation and Development shall identify updates to the
statewide land use planning program  and local comprehensive plans and zoning codes that
are needed in order  to incorporate wildfire risk maps and minimize wildfire risk, including
the appropriate levels of state and local resources necessary for effective implementation.
(3) Updates may include, but need not be limited  to, provisions regarding sufficient
defensible space, building codes, safe evacuation and  development considerations in areas of
extreme and high wildfire risk, allowing for regional differences.
(4) On or before October 1, 2022,  the Department of Land Conservation and Development
shall:
(a) Complete the updates.
(b) Report to a  committee or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly related to
wildfire, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, to the State Wildfire  Programs Director and
to the Wildfire Programs Advisory Council on the updates. The report  must include recom-
mendations concerning the updates.
Enrolled Senate Bill 762 (SB 762-C) Page 6
(5) As necessary to identify needed updates  and develop the recommendations required
by subsection (4)(b) of this section, the department may consult  with the State Fire Marshal,
the State Forestry  Department, the Department of Consumer and Business Services and lo-
cal governments.
BUILDING CODES
SECTION 12. (1) For extreme and high wildfire risk classes in the wildland-urban inter-
face that are identified pursuant to section 7 of this  2021 Act, the Department of Consumer
and Business Services shall adopt wildfire hazard  mitigation building code standards that
apply to new dwellings and the accessory structures of dwellings, as described in section R327
of the 2021 Oregon Residential Specialty Code.
(2) The  department shall amend section R327 of the Oregon Residential Specialty Code
to include standards for  additions to existing dwellings and accessory structures and for re-
placement of existing exterior elements covered in section R327 of the 2021 Oregon  Residen-
tial Specialty Code.
(3) The department  shall incorporate the standards described in subsections (1) and (2)
of this section into any updates to the Oregon Residential Specialty Code.
SECTION 12a.
(1) The Department of Consumer  and Business Services shall take the
actions required by section 12 (1) and (2) of this 2021 Act not later than October 1, 2022.
(2) The standards described in section 12 (1) and  (2) of this 2021 Act may not become
operative before April 1, 2023.
SECTION 12b. Not more than two years after the standards described in section  12 (1)
and (2) of this 2021 Act are adopted, the Department of Consumer and  Business Services
shall update section R327 of the Oregon Residential Specialty Code to:
(1) Ensure that the code incorporates  the standards described in section 12 (1) and (2)
of this 2021 Act; and
(2) Make any necessary adjustments  to the applicability of the standards and permitting
requirements in the code.
SECTION 12c. The Department of Consumer and Business Services:
(1) Shall develop and maintain an interactive mapping tool that displays, at the  property
level, wildfire hazard mitigation standards covered in section R327 of  the Oregon Residential
Specialty Code. The tool must be designed to support future inclusion of  snow load, seismic
and wind building code standards at the property level.
(2) Shall collaborate with Oregon State University to obtain any needed  information from
the Oregon Wildfire Risk Explorer and national or science-based sources in  order to develop
the tool.
(3) Shall ensure that the tool is displayed in an electronic format and available to  the
public at no charge.
(4) Shall periodically update the tool when the relevant building code is updated.
(5) May enter into  an agreement with the university concerning services required to de-
velop and maintain the tool.
SECTION 12d.
(1) The Department of  Consumer and Business Services shall develop the
interactive mapping tool described in section 12c of this  2021 Act not more than 60 days after
the statewide map of wildfire risk described in section 7 of this 2021 Act is developed.
(2) Any delay in developing the tool may not affect a deadline concerning the map.
HEALTH SYSTEMS FOR SMOKE
SECTION 13. The Department of Environmental Quality shall develop and implement a
program for supporting  local communities, in detecting, preparing for, communicating or
mitigating the environmental and public health impacts of wildfire smoke.
Enrolled Senate Bill 762 (SB 762-C) Page 7
SECTION 13a. The Department  of Environmental Quality shall establish a program for
supporting local communities through intergovernmental agreements, grants, contracts or
cooperative agreements to develop and  implement community response plans to enhance the
communities’ readiness and mitigation capacity for smoke.
SECTION 13b.
(1) The Department of Environmental Quality shall  establish and imple-
ment a program to support communities across this state in monitoring, interpreting and
communicating data related to ambient air quality conditions caused by wildfire smoke.
(2) As part of the program, the department shall:
(a) Conduct community outreach in areas of this  state that are prone to poor air quality
attributable to elevated levels of particulate matter.
(b) Deploy air quality monitoring equipment in a manner sufficient to evaluate an  in-
creased prevalence of poor air quality attributable to elevated levels of particulate matter.
(c) Monitor meteorological conditions  in a manner sufficient to forecast occurrences of
poor air quality.
SECTION 14.
(1) As used  in this section, “smoke filtration system” means an air
filtration system capable of removing particulates and other harmful components of  wildfire
smoke in a public building.
(2) In consultation and coordination with the Oregon Health Authority, the Department
of Human Services shall establish and implement a grant  program that allows local govern-
ments to:
(a) Establish emergency clean air shelters.
(b) Equip public buildings with smoke filtration systems so the public buildings may serve
as cleaner air spaces during wildfire smoke and other poor air quality events.
(3) The department shall require grantees to provide access to the clean  air shelters at
no charge.
SECTION 14a.
The Department of  Human Services is the lead state agency for clean air
shelter operations. The department shall:
(1) Consult and collaborate with the Oregon Health Authority to align practices for vol-
untary evacuations and emergency sheltering operations.
(2) Coordinate with the authority in setting priorities for  awarding grants described in
section 14 of this 2021 Act.
(3) Provide support to local agencies that take lead  roles in operating and planning clean
air shelters in the local agencies’ jurisdictions.
SECTION 14b. No later than  June 30, 2023, in consultation with the Oregon Health Au-
thority, the Department of Human Services shall report to an  appropriate committee or in-
terim committee of the Legislative Assembly, in the manner described in ORS 192.245, to  the
State Wildfire Programs Director and to the Wildfire Programs Advisory Council on:
(1) The grants administered pursuant  to section 14 of this 2021 Act, including information
about which local governments received grants.
(2) Any barriers to administering the grants.
(3) Areas for improving the grant program described in section 14 of this 2012 Act.
(4) Public health impacts from wildfire smoke events.
SECTION 15.
(1) As used in this section, “smoke  filtration device” means portable air
cleaners and furnace, heating,  ventilation and air conditioning filters that are intended to
remove contaminants, including particulates  and other harmful components of wildfire
smoke, from the air in a room to improve indoor air quality.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority  shall establish a program to increase the availability
of residential smoke filtration devices among persons vulnerable  to the health effects of
wildfire smoke who reside in areas susceptible to wildfire smoke.
(3) The authority may award grants for the purchase of smoke filtration devices.
(4) If the authority awards grants described in this  section, the authority shall give pri-
ority to funding for smoke  filtration devices in residential buildings occupied by persons who
Enrolled Senate Bill 762 (SB 762-C) Page 8
qualify for the Oregon Health Plan or Medicaid and are vulnerable to the  health effects of
wildfire smoke.
(5) The authority may adopt rules establishing standards for smoke filtration devices
obtained with grant moneys  received under this section, including, but not limited to, mini-
mum acceptable efficiency for the removal of  particulates and other harmful substances
generated by wildfires.
(6) The  authority may provide information and refer service providers to grantees that
need housing  interventions to facilitate effective use of smoke filtration devices, including
interventions such as weather proofing.
SECTION 15a. The Oregon Health Authority  shall periodically report to an appropriate
committee or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly,  as described in ORS 192.245,
to the State Wildfire Programs Director and to the Wildfire Programs Advisory Council on:
(1) The use of smoke filtration devices funded under section 15 of this 2021  Act, including
use of the smoke filtration devices by vulnerable and underserved communities.
(2) The effectiveness of the programs described in section 15 of this 2021 Act.
(3) Areas for improvement.
(4) Public health impacts during wildfire smoke events.
(5) Whether funding described in section 15 of this 2021 Act has provided a public health
return on investment.
EMERGENCY RESPONSE AND DISASTER RECOVERY
SECTION 16.
 ORS 401.025 is amended to read:
401.025. As used in this chapter:
(1) “Emergency” means a human created  or natural event or circumstance that causes or
threatens widespread loss  of life, injury to person or property, human suffering or financial loss,
including but not limited to:
(a) Fire, wildfire, explosion, flood, severe weather, landslides or mud slides, drought, earth-
quake, volcanic activity, tsunamis or other oceanic phenomena, spills or releases of  oil or hazardous
material as  defined in ORS 466.605, contamination, utility or transportation emergencies, disease,
blight, infestation, civil disturbance, riot, sabotage, acts of terrorism and war; and
(b) A rapid influx of individuals from outside this state, a rapid  migration of individuals from
one part of this state to another or a rapid displacement of individuals if  the influx, migration or
displacement results from the type of event or circumstance  described in paragraph (a) of this sub-
section.
(2) “Emergency  service agency” means an organization within a local government that performs
essential services for the public’s benefit before, during  or after an emergency, such as law
enforcement, fire control, health, medical  and sanitation services, public works and engineering,
public information and communications.
(3) “Emergency services”  means activities engaged in by state and local government agencies
to prepare for an emergency and to prevent, minimize, respond to or recover from an  emergency,
including but not limited to coordination,  preparedness planning, training, interagency liaison, fire
fighting, oil or hazardous material spill or release cleanup as defined in ORS 466.605,  law enforce-
ment, medical, health and sanitation services, engineering and public works, search and rescue  ac-
tivities, warning and public information, damage assessment, administration and fiscal management,
and those measures defined as “civil defense” in 50 U.S.C. app. 2252.
(4) “Local government” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.116.
(5) “Major disaster” means any event defined as a “major disaster” under 42 U.S.C. 5122(2).
SECTION 17.
(1) The Office  of Emergency Management shall update its statewide emer-
gency plan as necessary to prepare for or respond to wildfire emergencies  on an area-wide
or statewide  basis. The plan developed by the office to prepare for or respond to wildfire
Enrolled Senate Bill 762 (SB 762-C) Page 9
emergencies shall include,  but need not be limited to, wildfire risk mitigation efforts and
evacuation planning.
(2) The  office shall coordinate with cities, counties, adult foster homes, health care fa-
cilities and residential facilities, the Department of Human Services and the  Oregon Health
Authority to establish local or private procedures to prepare for emergencies related  to
wildfire and ensure that local efforts to prevent, respond to  or recover from an emergency
caused by wildfire are conducted in a manner consistent with the plan developed by the office
to prepare for  or respond to wildfire emergencies. The coordinated activities may include,
but need not be limited to, providing training, carrying out exercises  and promoting com-
munity education.
SECTION 17a. The Office of Emergency Management  shall conduct the update required
by section 17 (1) of this 2021 Act on or before December 31, 2021.
REDUCTION OF WILDFIRE RISK
SECTION 18. (1)(a) The State Forestry Department  shall design and implement a pro-
gram to reduce wildfire risk through the restoration  of landscape resiliency and the re-
duction of hazardous fuel on  public or private forestlands and rangelands and in communities
near homes and critical infrastructure.
(b) The department shall ensure that the program is consistent with the objectives de-
scribed in this section and biennially select, administer and evaluate projects consistent  with
the objectives described in this subsection.
(c) When developing program and project selection criteria, the department shall, to the
extent practicable, consult and  cooperate with state and federal agencies, counties, cities and
other units of local government, federally recognized Indian tribes in  this state, public and
private forestland and rangeland owners, forest and rangeland  collaboratives and other rel-
evant community organizations and ensure consistency with the  priorities described in sub-
section (3) of this section.
(2) The department shall develop  a 20-year strategic plan, as described in the Shared
Stewardship Agreement signed on August 13, 2019, that prioritizes restoration  actions and
geographies for  wildfire risk reduction. The plan must be able to be used to direct federal,
state and private investments in a tangible way.
(3) In selecting and administering projects, the department shall:
(a) In collaboration with  the Oregon State University Extension Service and other enti-
ties, identify strategic landscapes that are ready for treatment, giving priority to  projects
within the landscapes that are:
(A) On lands in the four highest eNVC  risk classes identified in the United States Forest
Service report titled “Pacific  Northwest Quantitative Wildfire Risk Assessment: Methods and
Results” and dated April 9, 2018;
(B) Inclusive of federal lands with treatment projects currently approved under the Na-
tional Environmental Policy Act (42 U.S.C. 4321 et seq.);
(C) Focusing  on treatments protective of human life, property, critical infrastructure,
watershed health and forest or rangeland habitat restoration; and
(D) Part of a collaborative partnership with agreements across diverse forestland or
rangeland stakeholders that  use an expansive, landscape-scale approach to address underly-
ing causes of poor wildfire resilience and elevated risk  of wildfire or that establish innovative
approaches to addressing the underlying causes that could be implemented on a larger scale.
(b) To the extent practicable, identify and support projects that are designed to:
(A) Evaluate varying types of fuel treatment methods;
(B) Leverage the collective power  of public-private partnerships and federal and state
funding, including leverage of the coordination of funding to  support collaborative initiatives
Enrolled Senate Bill 762 (SB 762-C) Page 10
that address the underlying causes of elevated  forestland and rangeland wildfire risk across
ownerships; and
(C) Optimize the receipt of federal  government investments that equal or exceed de-
partment investments.
(c) Design the projects  to involve existing forest-based and range-based contracting en-
tities.
(d) Design the projects to complement programs  and projects of the Oregon Watershed
Enhancement Board or other state agencies as needed.
(e) Design the projects to involve the Oregon Conservation Corps  Program established
by section 21 of this 2021 Act, to the maximum extent possible, for  community protection
projects located in the wildland-urban interface, subject to funding available in  the Oregon
Conservation Corps Fund established by section 23 of this 2021 Act.
(f) Affirmatively seek, and enhance opportunities for, collaboration from stakeholders
holding a wide variety of perspectives regarding forest and rangeland management and  op-
portunities for significant involvement by communities in proximity to project sites.
(g) Engage  in monitoring of the projects to produce useful information on which to base
recommendations to the Legislative Assembly.
(4) A project under this section may not include commercial thinning on:
(a) Inventoried roadless areas;
(b) Riparian reserves identified in the Northwest  Forest Plan or in federal Bureau of
Land Management resource management plans;
(c) Late successional reserves, except to the extent  consistent with the 2011 United
States Fish and Wildlife Service Revised Recovery Plan for the  Northern Spotted Owl (Strix
occidentalis caurina);
(d) Areas protected under the federal Wild and Scenic Rivers Act (P.L. 90-542), national
recreation areas, national monuments or areas protected under ORS 390.805 to 390.925;
(e) Designated critical habitat for species listed as threatened or endangered under the
Endangered Species Act of 1973 (P.L. 93-205) or by the State Fish and Wildlife  Commission
under ORS  496.172, unless commercial thinning is already allowed under an existing envi-
ronmental review or recognized habitat recovery plan; or
(f) Federally designated areas of critical  environmental concern or federally designated
wilderness study areas.
(5) The department shall give public notice,  and allow reasonable opportunity for public
input, when identifying and selecting landscapes under this section.
SECTION 19.
Section 18 of this 2021 Act does not expand, diminish or otherwise affect a
right, privilege, duty or function established under federal, state or local laws or rules that
pertain to the management of private lands in this state.
SECTION 20. (1) The State Forestry Department shall complete the operation of projects
under section 18 of this 2021 Act no later than June 30, 2023.
(2) The department shall  report regarding progress in carrying out projects under section
18 of this 2021 Act to an interim committee of the Legislative Assembly related to  natural
resources, in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and to the Governor,  State Wildfire Pro-
grams Director and Wildfire Programs Advisory Council no later than January 15,  2022. The
report shall include, but need not be limited to:
(a) An  explanation of how landscapes were selected, a summary of the selected projects,
a description of initial outcomes from  projects selected under the requirements established
by section 18 of this 2021 Act, anticipated time frames for completion of  the projects and any
initial recommendations concerning landscape identification and projects selected under  the
requirements established by section 18 of this 2021 Act;
(b) A description of the funding source types and amounts secured by  the department
as matching funds to implement projects; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 762 (SB 762-C) Page 11
(c) A summary of outreach and  coordination with relevant federal and state agencies,
counties, cities and other units  of local government, federally recognized Indian tribes in this
state, public and  private forestland and rangeland owners, forestland and rangeland
collaboratives and other relevant community organizations  to identify and select landscapes
for treatment and develop selection criteria for projects.
(3)(a) The department shall report its  findings and recommendations regarding wildfire
risk reduction on  forestland and rangeland and in communities, based on information ob-
tained from the projects described in section 18 of this  2021 Act, to an interim committee
of the Legislative Assembly related  to natural resources, in the manner provided by ORS
192.245, and to the Governor, State Wildfire Programs Director and  Wildfire Programs Ad-
visory Council no later than July 15, 2023. The report shall include, but need not be  limited
to:
(A) A qualitative and quantitative summary of the project outcomes that, at a minimum,
states the number of  acres treated, the treatment actions carried out and any resulting or
anticipated changes in landscape conditions related  to enhanced resiliency or the mitigation
of wildfire risk to public values;
(B) The identification of barriers to more efficient implementation and achievement  of
goals in future wildfire risk reduction projects;
(C) A qualitative and quantitative  summary of the use of prescribed fire activities and
invasive annual grass treatments for wildfire risk reduction that, at  a minimum, states the
number of acres burned  or treated and any resulting or anticipated changes in landscape
conditions related to enhanced resiliency or the mitigation of wildfire risk to public values;
(D) The identification of existing  disincentives to, and recommendation for reducing
barriers to, the use of prescribed fire;
(E) Recommendations for creating optimal working relationships with forestland or
rangeland collaboratives and other relevant  community organizations regarding future
wildfire risk reduction projects;
(F) A description  of the funding source types and amounts secured by the department
as matching funds to carry out projects; and
(G) Recommendations for investment in future wildfire risk reduction projects to be
carried out in the 2023-2025 biennium.
(b) In developing the report required under this subsection,  the department shall work
in coordination with federal land management agencies, institutions of higher education and
third parties to develop consistent performance measurements  and condition-based metrics
for monitoring and communicating the effectiveness of  state investments and project actions
in reducing wildfire risk on public or private forestlands and rangelands and in communities.
OREGON CONSERVATION CORPS
SECTION 21.
(1) The Oregon Conservation Corps Program is established  for the purposes
of:
(a) Reducing the risk wildfire poses to communities and critical infrastructure.
(b) Helping to create fire-adapted communities.
(c) Engaging youth and young adults in workforce training.
(2) Youth and young adults between 13 years of age and  26 years of age who have been
qualified by a youth development organization may  participate in projects undertaken by the
corps.
(3) Notwithstanding any contrary provision  of law, participants in projects undertaken
by the corps:
(a) Are not employees of the corps.
(b) Are exempt from prevailing wage laws.
Enrolled Senate Bill 762 (SB 762-C) Page 12
(c) Must receive compensation for their participation of at least minimum wage or  an
allowance or stipend  that, when combined with other sources of payment the participant is
eligible to receive, including academic credit or an  AmeriCorps education award, is equiv-
alent to the value of minimum wage.
SECTION 22. (1) As used  in this section, “eligible organization” includes Oregon-based
nonprofit youth development organizations and public  entities that provide programs of job
training, skill development and forest-related or rangeland-related career path training.
(2) The Oregon Conservation Corps Advisory Committee is established within the  Higher
Education Coordinating Commission for the  purpose of managing the Oregon Conservation
Corps Program.
(3) The Governor shall determine the number of members on  the committee and appoint
the members.
(4) The committee shall, in collaboration with a qualified  nonprofit foundation, actively
seek and source private donations to support the Oregon Conservation Corps Program.
(5) The committee may direct the expenditure  of moneys from the Oregon Conservation
Corps Fund for a promotional website and materials to solicit private funds.
(6) Members may not receive compensation for service on the committee, but, subject
to any applicable laws regulating travel and other expenses of state officers  and employees,
may be reimbursed for actual and necessary travel and other expenses incurred in the per-
formance of  committee duties with moneys available to the commission for the purpose of
reimbursing the members.
(7) The committee shall administer a grant process that:
(a) Provides funding to support the work conducted  by the Oregon Conservation Corps
Program.
(b) Defines  and uses an equity lens in awarding grants by identifying and supporting
populations with greater vulnerability including communities of color, indigenous  communi-
ties, communities with members who have limited proficiency in  English and communities
with lower-income members.
(c) Awards grants to eligible organizations.
(d) Ensures that grant awards  support activities described in section 21 (1) of this 2021
Act and subsection (8) of this section.
(e) Establishes guidelines  for prioritizing grant-supported projects to reduce community
fire risks, promote  youth and young adult workforce development and educational experi-
ences and reduce hazardous fuels.
(8) The committee shall consult with the State Forestry Department to ensure  that the
grant process awards funds to proposals that:
(a) Protect at-risk communities and infrastructure within the wildland-urban interface,
as described in section 18 of this 2021 Act.
(b) Meet standards for fuel treatment established by the department.
(9) The committee shall biennially submit a report, on the  timeline described in ORS
293.640, to an appropriate committee or interim committee of the Legislative  Assembly, as
described in ORS 192.245, and to the State Wildfire Programs Director and Wildfire Programs
Advisory Council, regarding the expenditure of moneys deposited in  the Oregon Conservation
Corps Fund.
SECTION 23.
(1) The Oregon Conservation Corps Fund is established in the State Treas-
ury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest  earned by the Oregon Conserva-
tion Corps Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The fund may receive contributions from individuals and private organizations.
(3) Moneys in the fund  are continuously appropriated to the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission to be used as directed by the Oregon Conservation Corps  Advisory Com-
mittee and for related administrative expenses of the commission.
Enrolled Senate Bill 762 (SB 762-C) Page 13
(4) The commission shall keep records of all  moneys credited to and deposited in the fund
and the activity or program against which each withdrawal from the fund is charged.
SMALL FORESTLAND GRANT PROGRAM
SECTION 24. (1) As used in  this section, “small forestland owner” means an individual,
group, federally recognized Indian tribe in Oregon or association that owns:
(a) Up to 160 acres of  nonindustrial private forestland west of the crest of the Cascade
Mountains; or
(b) Up to  640 acres of nonindustrial private forestland east of the crest of the Cascade
Mountains.
(2) The State Forestry Department shall establish a small forestland  grant program for
the purpose of providing grants, on a competitive basis, to support small forestland owners
in reducing wildfire risk  through the restoration of landscape resiliency and the reduction
of hazardous fuels on the owners’ property.
(3) In consultation with partners and stakeholders,  the department shall set criteria for
assessing grant applications and awarding grants. The criteria may include, but  need not be
limited to:
(a) Prioritization of projects on forestland in  extreme or high wildfire risk classes de-
scribed in section 7 of this 2021 Act.
(b) Owner commitment to maintaining fuel reduction treatments.
(c) Owner possession of a forest management plan.
(d) Project proximity  to current or past fuel mitigation efforts, supported by any owner
or funding source, that  would contribute to cross-boundary, landscape-scale forest resiliency.
(e) Whether the project addresses  additional resource concerns, such as insect and dis-
ease management.
(f) Whether critical facilities and infrastructure may receive enhanced protection due to
project outcomes.
PRESCRIBED FIRE
SECTION 25.
The State Forestry Department shall adopt rules to clarify that a  person
may:
(1) Conduct a prescribed fire that burns across land ownership boundaries if the person
obtains a permit for the  fire as described in ORS 477.515 or 477.625 and complies with the
conditions of the permit.
(2) Obtain a single permit under ORS  477.515 or 477.625 for a prescribed fire that burns
across land ownership boundaries if the person demonstrates to the  department that the
person has obtained consent to conduct the fire from all persons on whose  lands the fire is
planned to burn.
SECTION 25a. The State Forestry Department shall initiate the rulemaking  described in
section 25 of this  2021 Act on or before November 30, 2021, and finalize the rulemaking on
or before November 30, 2022.
SECTION 26.  ORS 526.360 is amended to read:
526.360. (1) The State Board of Forestry , [ and the forester ] the State Forester and  forest
protective associations  may assist to the extent [ possible] practical  in developing, for forestry,
grazing or agricultural uses, all forestland classified pursuant to ORS  526.328 or 526.340 for such
uses, including the burning of brush or other flammable material for the purpose of:
(a) Removing a fire hazard to any property;
(b) Preparing seed beds;
(c) Removing obstructions  to or interference with the proper seeding or agricultural or grazing
development or use of that land;
Enrolled Senate Bill 762 (SB 762-C) Page 14
(d) Promoting the establishment  of new forest crops on cutover, denuded or underproductive
lands;
(e) Implementing  pest prevention and suppression activities, as provided in ORS 527.310 to
527.370; or
(f) Promoting improvements to forest health, including improvements to fish  and wildlife habitat.
(2) Upon request of the owner or the agent  of the owner of any forestland classified pursuant
to ORS  526.328 or 526.340, the forester or a forest protective association may perform or super-
vise burning operations thereon for any of the purposes stated in subsection  (1) of this section. The
owner or the agent of the owner shall supply such personnel  and equipment and shall perform such
fire control  actions and activities as the forester  or forest protective association  may require
while there is danger of the fire spreading. The forester or forest protective association  may re-
fuse to perform or supervise burning or to issue any  burning permit when, in the judgment of the
forester  or forest protective association , conditions so warrant.
(3) To accomplish the purposes set forth in subsection (1)  of this section, the [ State Board of
Forestry may ] board shall  establish by rule a Certified Burn Manager program.
(4) The rules shall include:
(a) Certification standards, requirements and procedures;
(b) Standards, requirements and procedures to revoke certification;
(c) Actions and activities that a Certified Burn Manager must perform;
(d) Actions and activities that a Certified Burn Manager may not allow or perform;
(e) Limitations on the use of a Certified Burn Manager; and
(f) Any other standard, requirement  or procedure that the board considers necessary for the safe
and effective administration of the program.
(5) The rules may establish and impose fees for participation in the program.
[(4)] (6) When [ any] a burning for any of  the purposes stated in subsection (1) of this section on
forestland classified pursuant to ORS 526.328 or 526.340 is started under the  supervision of and
supervised by the forester , a forest protective association  or a Certified Burn Manager,  [ no] a
person [ shall] may not  be held liable for property damage resulting from that burning unless the
damage is caused by the negligence of the person.
SECTION 27.
By December 1, 2021, the State Board of Forestry shall:
(1) Consult with  the Oregon Prescribed Fire Council concerning best practices for con-
ducting the Certified Burn Manager program described in ORS 526.360;
(2) Initiate rulemaking to establish the program; and
(3) Report in the manner provided in ORS 192.245 to  an appropriate committee or interim
committee of the Legislative Assembly on progress  the board has made in establishing and
implementing the program and when the board expects to launch the program.
FEDERAL PARTNERSHIPS
SECTION 27a.
The State Forestry Department  shall cooperate with federal agencies to
increase the  effectiveness of activities undertaken pursuant to ORS 526.271, 526.274 and
526.275.
PROTECTED AREAS
SECTION 28. (1) The State Forester, in collaboration with  the State Fire Marshal, state
agencies and local  governments as defined in ORS 174.116, shall adopt rules establishing
baseline levels of wildfire protection for lands that are outside of forest protection  districts
and susceptible  to wildfire. When establishing the baseline levels for lands, the State
Forester shall ensure that the levels are adapted to reflect regional conditions. A county,  in
collaboration with the State Forester and the State Fire Marshal, may work  to ensure that
all lands within the county that are outside of forest protection districts and susceptible to
Enrolled Senate Bill 762 (SB 762-C) Page 15
wildfire are provided with wildfire protection services  at the applicable baseline level or a
higher level. As used in this  subsection, “forest protection districts” means lands designated
in State Forester rules as provided under ORS 477.225.
(2) A county, in collaboration with the State Forester  and the State Fire Marshal, may
assist:
(a) Landowners, individuals and businesses with forming  jurisdictions to provide wildfire
protection;
(b) Landowners, individuals, businesses and jurisdictions with obtaining expansion  of or
other changes to boundaries or facility locations of jurisdictions that provide wildfire  pro-
tection;
(c) Jurisdictions to expand or adjust jurisdiction service boundaries to ensure adequate
wildfire protection for lands; and
(d) Jurisdictions in developing wildfire protection facilities, equipment, training and other
resources adequate to ensure that the jurisdiction  provides timely and effective wildfire
protection at  the baseline level or higher on lands described in subsection (1) of this section
throughout the jurisdiction.
(3) The State Forester may provide financial assistance to counties for carrying out
county duties under subsection (2) of this section from any  funds made available to the State
Forester and designated for that purpose.
SECTION 29. A county shall ensure no later than January 1, 2026, that all lands described
in section 28  (1) of this 2021 Act within the county have baseline level or higher wildfire
protection as described in section 28 of this 2021 Act.
WILDFIRE RESPONSE CAPACITY
SECTION 30. (1) The State Forestry  Department shall establish and maintain an ex-
panded system of automated smoke detection cameras that includes  staffing in detection
centers to monitor and alert fire suppression staff when fires are detected.
(2) The system must  serve the purposes of quickly detecting, locating and extinguishing
fires and keeping fires as small as possible.
SECTION 30a. The State Forestry Department:
(1) Shall consult and coordinate with  federal agencies, private stakeholders and other
state agencies to determine the adequacy of state, federal and private wildfire  response ca-
pacity. The department shall act to facilitate wildfire prevention and wildfire response
communication and coordination between federal, state, local and private entities.
(2) Shall increase  the department’s wildfire readiness and response capacity, including
increases to fire suppression response  personnel, aviation assets and necessary administra-
tive support personnel, to the extent the department receives funding for the increase.
(3) Shall, to the extent practicable, seek to leverage state moneys to obtain an increase
in federal wildfire resources available to Oregon for effective initial response purposes.
(4) Shall consult with the office of the State Fire Marshal and with local  fire defense
board chiefs to assess  the adequacy of available mutual aid to provide wildfire response on
wildland-urban interface lands and to identify means for providing  additional resources from
the state or other entities to enhance wildfire response capacity  on wildland-urban interface
lands.
(5) Shall continually  identify workforce development needs associated with wildfire risk
mitigation and wildfire response and develop funding proposals for  meeting those needs on
a sustained basis.  The identified workforce development needs must align with wildfire risk
to provide an adequate level of wildfire protection, as described in ORS 477.062.
(6) May enter into cooperative agreements or contracts  with a local or private entity for
the purpose of assisting the entity to organize for purposes of wildfire risk mitigation or
wildfire response, including, but not limited to,  facilitating wildfire training and the acquisi-
Enrolled Senate Bill 762 (SB 762-C) Page 16
tion of firefighting equipment for the entity and assisting  with payment for liability insur-
ance and other administrative expenses of the entity  associated with wildfire risk mitigation
or wildfire response.
SECTION 30b. (1) The office of the State Fire Marshal shall increase  the office’s wildfire
readiness and response capacity to the extent the office  receives funding for the increase,
by means including:
(a) Increasing fire prevention and response personnel and fire  administrative support
personnel to address planning, communications, training, deployment and safety.
(b) Implementing innovative technologies and  modernizing systems to expedite fire re-
source deployment in an efficient and safe manner.
(2) The State Fire Marshal may:
(a) Designate funding intended for the Oregon fire mutual aid system to  support prepo-
sitioning of resources and costs.
(b) Enter into contracts with federal or state agencies, other states, political subdivi-
sions, corporations  and authorities having fire suppression jurisdiction for fire prevention,
suppression, coordination and response.
WILDLAND-URBAN INTERFACE FIRE PROTECTION
SECTION 31.
 ORS 477.015 is amended to read:
477.015. [(1)] As used in this section and  ORS [ 477.015 to 477.061] 477.025 and 477.027, [ unless
the context otherwise requires, ] “[ forestland-urban] wildland-urban  interface” [ means] has the
meaning given that term in rule by the State Board of Forestry.  [a geographic area of forestland
inside a forest protection district where there exists a concentration of structures in an urban  or sub-
urban setting. ]
[(2) As used in ORS 477.015 to 477.057, unless the context requires otherwise: ]
[(a) “Committee” means a county forestland-urban interface classification committee. ]
[(b) “Governing body” means the board of county commissioners  or county court of a county, as the
case may be. ]
SECTION 32.  ORS 477.025 is amended to read:
477.025. The  Legislative Assembly recognizes that the [ forestland] wildland-urban interface in
Oregon  varies  by condition, situation, fire hazard and risk, that different [ forestland] wildland-urban
interface fire protection  problems exist across the state because of this variability, and that these
different problems necessitate varied fire prevention and protection practices . [ and that, in order  to
give recognition to such differences and their  effect on the accomplishment of the public policy stated
in ORS 477.023, certain classifications of the forestland-urban interface within  the State of Oregon are
established by ORS 477.027 to 477.057. ]
SECTION 33.  ORS 477.027 is amended to read:
477.027. (1) By  [ administrative] rule, considering national best practices,  the State Board of
Forestry shall establish :
(a) A definition of “wildland-urban interface.”
(b) Criteria by which the [ forestland-urban] wildland-urban interface [ shall] must  be identified
and classified.
(2) The criteria [ shall]:
(a) Must recognize differences across the  state in fire hazard, fire risk and structural charac-
teristics within the [ forestland-urban] wildland-urban interface.
(b) May not exclude a category of land from inclusion in the wildland-urban interface.
(3) Based on  the criteria [ shall include not less than three nor more than ], the board shall es-
tablish five classes of [ forestland-urban] wildland-urban interface.
(4) The classes  must be integrated into the comprehensive statewide map described in
section 7 of this 2021 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 762 (SB 762-C) Page 17
SECTION 33a. The State Board of Forestry shall adopt by rule  the definition described
in ORS 477.027 (1)(a), as amended by section 33 of this 2021 Act, not later than 100 days after
the effective date of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 34.
ORS 477.017, 477.018, 477.023, 477.029, 477.031, 477.052,  477.054, 477.057,
477.059, 477.060 and 477.061 are repealed.
STATE WILDFIRE PROGRAMS DIRECTOR
SECTION 35. (1) The Governor shall appoint a State Wildfire Programs Director to serve
at the pleasure of the Governor.
(2) The duties of the director shall include:
(a) Overseeing implementation of requirements and  authorization provided by this 2021
Act.
(b) Coordinating and  integrating activities of state agencies and other entities that are
required or authorized by this 2021 Act  in order to optimize the efficiency and effectiveness
of the activities.
(c) Ensuring compliance with deadlines set out in this 2021 Act.
(d) Monitoring and assessing any financial impacts of the activities on local  jurisdictions
and the equity of those financial impacts among the jurisdictions.
(e) Supervising staffing of the Wildfire Programs Advisory Council.
(f) Reporting at least  every 60 days to the Governor, the President of the Senate, the
Speaker of the House of Representatives and the chairs  of relevant committees and interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly to summarize progress on implementing  the activ-
ities, note obstacles and opportunities and  catalog possibilities for future improvements to
further reduce wildfire risk in this state.
(g) Exploring additional opportunities  to reduce wildfire risk, including but not limited
to engaging with:
(A) Insurance companies regarding insurance policy  coverage provisions, underwriting
standards, insurance rates and any other topics relevant to enhancing  the protection of
property from wildfire at a reasonable cost.
(B) Electric  utilities regarding further actions to protect public safety, reduce risk to
electric company customers and promote electrical system resilience to wildfire damage.
(C) Congressional delegations and federal agencies to expand opportunities for cost-share
partnerships for wildfire mitigation and develop strategies for  improvements to federal fire
management policies.
(h) Collaborating with the State Resilience Officer and participating in  any relevant
emergency preparedness advisory councils.
WILDFIRE PROGRAMS ADVISORY COUNCIL
SECTION 36.
(1) As  used in this section, “defensible space” has the meaning given that
term in section 8 of this 2021 Act.
(2) There is  established a Wildfire Programs Advisory Council to advise and assist the
State Wildfire Programs Director by:
(a) Closely monitoring implementation of activities related to wildfire prevention and re-
sponse, including receiving and evaluating agency reports related to wildfire  prevention and
response.
(b) Providing advice on potential changes to the activities in order to fulfill the goal of
dramatically reducing wildfire risk in  this state and ensuring that regional defensible space,
building codes and land use applications are appropriate.
(c) Strengthening intergovernmental and multiparty collaboration and enhancing  collab-
oration between governments and stakeholders on an ongoing basis.
Enrolled Senate Bill 762 (SB 762-C) Page 18
(d) Developing strategies to enhance collaboration among governmental bodies and the
general public.
(e) Assessing ways  the statewide map of wildfire risk described in section 7 of this 2021
Act may inform development of building codes and land use laws, rules and decisions, in a
regionally appropriate manner.
(f) Assessing the application of  defensible space requirements to vineyards, crops and
other cultivated vegetation.
(g) Reviewing Department of Land Conservation and  Development findings and recom-
mendations in the report required by section 11 of this 2021 Act and making additional re-
commendations related to potential updates to the statewide  land use planning program,
local comprehensive plans and  zoning codes to incorporate wildfire risk maps and minimize
wildfire risk to people, public and private property,  businesses, infrastructure and natural
resources.
(3) The council is not a decision-making body but instead is established to  provide advice,
assistance, perspective, ideas and recommendations to  the State Wildfire Programs Director.
(4) The President of the Senate and Speaker of the House of Representatives shall jointly
appoint 19 members to the council as follows:
(a) One member who represents county government.
(b) One member who is a land use planning director of a county that is wholly or partially
within the wildland-urban interface.
(c) One member who represents city government.
(d) One member who is a land use planning director of a city that is  wholly or partially
within the wildland-urban interface.
(e) One member who represents fire chiefs and has experience with managing,  fighting
or preventing fire within the wildland-urban interface.
(f) One member  who represents fire marshals and has experience with managing, fighting
or preventing fire within the wildland-urban interface.
(g) One member who represents firefighters and  has experience with managing, fighting
or preventing fire within the wildland-urban interface.
(h) One member who represents  rural residential property owners whose property is
wholly or partially within the wildland-urban interface.
(i) One member who represents farming property owners whose property is  wholly or
partially within the wildland-urban interface.
(j) One member who represents ranching  property owners whose property is wholly or
partially within the wildland-urban interface.
(k) One member who represents  forestland owners whose property is wholly or partially
within the wildland-urban interface.
(L) One member who  represents federally recognized Indian tribes with land wholly or
partially within the wildland-urban interface.
(m) One member who represents a utility company.
(n) One member who represents environmental interests.
(o) One member who represents forest resiliency interests.
(p) One member who represents state or regional land use planning organizations.
(q) One member who represents land  and housing development interests or real estate
industry interests.
(r) One member who represents public health professionals.
(s) One member who represents the environmental justice community.
(5) The presiding officers shall  provide public notice of an opportunity for interested
parties to submit names of interest for appointment to the council.
(6) At least 30 days  before appointing a member, the presiding officers shall consult in
good faith with the  minority leaders of the Senate and House of Representatives on the ap-
pointment.
Enrolled Senate Bill 762 (SB 762-C) Page 19
(7) The term of service for each member is four years.
(8) The members are eligible for reappointment.
(9) The council shall elect a chairperson  and vice chairperson to serve for one-year
terms.
(10) The members shall serve on the council as volunteers and  are not entitled to re-
imbursement for expenses.
(11) The Department of Consumer and Business Services,  Department of Land Conser-
vation and  Development, office of the State Fire Marshal and State Forestry Department
shall each provide 15 percent of the time of a full-time equivalent employee to:
(a) Cooperatively staff the council.
(b) Attend council meetings as informational resources.
(c) Assist with drafting reports at the request of the council.
(d) Support the work of the State Wildfire Programs Director.
(12) The Oregon State University Extension Service shall  designate a person to serve as
staff for the council.
(13) Each October the council shall  submit a report to the Governor and appropriate
committees or  interim committees of the Legislative Assembly that describes progress on
implementing program activities related to defensible space, building codes, land use  and
community emergency preparedness and that recommends improvements.
SECTION 37.
(1) On or before September 1, 2021, members of the Wildfire Programs
Advisory Council must be appointed as described in section 36 (4) of this 2021 Act.
(2) On or before November 1, 2021, the council must begin meeting regularly.
SECTION 38.
Notwithstanding section 36 (7) of this 2021 Act, the term of service for the
members first appointed from each category described in section 36 (4)(a), (c), (e), (g), (i), (k),
(m), (o), (q) and (s) of this 2021 Act is three years.
SECTION 39. The Wildfire Programs Advisory  Council must make the first report de-
scribed in section 36 (13) of this 2021 Act in October 2022.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 40. For purposes of  the sellers’ property disclosure statements described in
ORS 105.464, “forestland-urban interface” has the same  meaning as “wildland-urban inter-
face,” as defined in ORS 477.015.
SECTION 41.  ORS 197.716 is amended to read:
197.716. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Economic opportunity analysis” means an analysis performed by a county that:
(A) Identifies the  major categories of industrial uses or other employment uses that could rea-
sonably be expected to expand or locate in the county based  on a review of trends on a national,
state, regional or county level;
(B) Identifies the number  of sites by type reasonably expected to be needed to accommodate the
expected employment growth based on the site characteristics typical of expected uses;
(C) Estimates  the types and amounts of industrial uses and other employment uses likely to oc-
cur in the county based  on subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph and considering the county’s
economic advantages and disadvantages, including:
(i) Location, size and buying power of markets;
(ii) Availability of transportation facilities for access and freight mobility;
(iii) Public facilities and public services;
(iv) Labor market factors;
(v) Access to suppliers and utilities;
(vi) Necessary support services;
(vii) Limits on development due to federal and state environmental protection laws; and
(viii) Educational and technical training programs;
Enrolled Senate Bill 762 (SB 762-C) Page 20
(D) Assesses community economic development potential through a public process in conjunction
with state  agencies and consistent with any categories or particular types of industrial uses and
other employment uses desired by the community as identified in an existing comprehensive plan;
(E) Examines  existing firms in the county to identify the types of sites that may require expan-
sion;
(F) Includes an  inventory of vacant and developed lands within the county designated for in-
dustrial use or other employment use, including:
(i) The  description, including site characteristics, of vacant or developed sites within each plan
or zoning district; and
(ii) A description of any development  constraints or infrastructure needs that affect the
buildable area of sites in the inventory; and
(G) Identifies additional  potential sites for designation and rezoning that could reasonably ac-
commodate expected industrial uses and other employment uses that cannot be met by existing  in-
ventories.
(b) “Industrial use” means industrial employment activities, including manufacturing,  assembly,
fabrication, processing, storage, logistics, warehousing, importation,  distribution and transshipment
and research and development.
(c) “Listed county” means Baker, Gilliam, Grant,  Harney, Lake, Malheur, Sherman, Union,
Wallowa or Wheeler County.
(d) “Other employment use” means all nonindustrial  employment activities, including small scale
commercial use, wholesale, service, nonprofit, business headquarters,  administrative, governmental
or employment activities that serve the medical, educational, social service, recreational or security
industries and that occupy retail, office or flexible building types of any  size or multibuilding cam-
puses.
(e) “Reasonably be expected to expand or locate in the county”  means that the county possesses
the appropriate locational factors for the use or category of use.
(f)(A) “Small scale commercial use” means the low-impact  use of land primarily for the retail
sale of products or services, including offices.
(B) “Small scale commercial use” does not include use of  land for factories, warehouses, freight
terminals or wholesale distribution centers.
(2) A listed county that has adopted an economic opportunity analysis as part of  its compre-
hensive plan may amend its  comprehensive plan, land use regulations and zoning map to designate
not more than 10 sites outside an urban growth boundary that cumulatively total not more than 50
acres of land if the  sites were identified in any economic opportunity analysis as additional potential
sites for industrial  uses or other employment uses in order to allow for industrial uses and other
employment uses without  requiring an exception under ORS 197.732 to any statewide land use
planning goals related to:
(a) Agriculture;
(b) Forest use; or
(c) Urbanization.
(3) A county may not designate a site under subsection (2) of this section:
(a) On any lands designated as high-value farmland as defined in ORS 195.300;
(b) Unless the county complies with ORS 197.714; and
(c) If any portion of the proposed site is for lands designated for forest use, unless the county:
(A) Notifies the State Forester in writing not less than 21 days before designating the site;  and
(B) Cooperates with the State Forester in:
(i) Updating and classifying [ forestland] wildland-urban interface lands in and around the site;
(ii) Taking necessary steps to implement or  update the [ forestland] wildland-urban interface fire
protection system in and around the site as described in ORS [ 477.015 to 477.061] 477.027; and
(iii) Implementing other fire protection measures authorized by the State Forester.
Enrolled Senate Bill 762 (SB 762-C) Page 21
(4) A county may not amend its comprehensive  plan, land use regulations or zoning map under
this section to allow a use that would  conflict with an administrative rule adopted for the purpose
of implementing the Oregon Sage-Grouse Action Plan and Executive Order 15-18.
SECTION 42.  ORS 205.130 is amended to read:
205.130. The county clerk shall:
(1) Have the custody of, and safely keep and preserve, all files and records of deeds and  mort-
gages of real property and a record of all maps, plats, contracts, powers  of attorney and other in-
terests affecting the title to real property required or permitted by law to be recorded.
(2) Record, or cause to be recorded, in a legible  and permanent manner, and keep in the office
of the county clerk, all:
(a) Deeds and mortgages of  real property, powers of attorney and contracts affecting the title
to real property, authorized by law to  be recorded, assignments thereof and of any interest therein
when properly acknowledged or proved and other interests affecting the title  to real property re-
quired or permitted by law to be recorded;
(b) Certificates of sale of  real property under execution or order of court, or assignments of
previously recorded certificates or of any interest in real property, when properly acknowledged  or
proved;
(c) Certified copies of death records of any  person appearing in the county records as owning
or having a claim or interest in land in the county. A  certified copy of a death record recorded in
the deed records of a county under this subsection is a public  record and is not subject to the dis-
closure limitations under ORS 432.350;
(d) Instruments presented for recording by the United States or the State  of Oregon, or a poli-
tical subdivision of either, that affect title to  or an interest in real property or that lawfully concern
real property;  and
(e) Instruments recognized  under state law or rule or federal law or regulation as affecting title
to or an interest in real property if the instrument is properly acknowledged or proved[ ; and ].
[(f) Orders  from a county forestland-urban interface classification committee filed under ORS
477.052.]
(3) Keep and maintain:
(a) Deed and mortgage records;
(b) Statutory lien records;
(c) A record called the County Clerk Lien Record in which the following shall be recorded:
(A) The warrants and orders of officers and agencies that are required or permitted by law to
be recorded; and
(B) All instruments presented  for recordation when required or permitted by law to be recorded
that affect the title to or an interest in real  property, other than instruments recorded in the deed
and mortgage records or the statutory lien records;
(d) Releases, satisfactions, assignments, amendments  and modifications of recorded instruments;
and
(e) Other instruments required or permitted by law to be recorded not affecting interests  in real
property.
(4) Perform all the duties in regard  to the recording and indexing of deeds and mortgages of real
property, contracts, abstracts of judgments, notices of pendency, powers of attorney  and other in-
terests when required or permitted  by law to be recorded that affect the title of real property, and
in regard to the entry of satisfaction and discharge of the same, together  with other documents re-
quired or permitted by law to be recorded.
(5) Incur no civil or criminal liability, either personally or in an official capacity, for recording
an instrument that does not comply with the provisions of law that require or  allow the recording
of the instrument.
SECTION 43.
 ORS 477.281 is amended to read:
477.281. (1) The obligation of an owner of timberland  or grazing land for payment of assessments
and taxes for fire protection of forestland is limited to:
Enrolled Senate Bill 762 (SB 762-C) Page 22
(a) The payment  of moneys pursuant to ORS 321.015 (2), 477.277, 477.295, 477.760 (4) and 477.880
to maintain the Oregon Forest Land Protection Fund; and
(b) The payment of forest protection district assessments pursuant to  ORS [ 477.060 and] 477.205
to 477.281.
(2) As used in this section,  “obligation of an owner of timberland or grazing land for payment
of assessments and taxes  for fire protection of forestland” does not include the duties or obligations
of the owner under ORS 477.066, 477.068 or 477.120 or the obligations of an owner of land included
in a rural fire protection district pursuant to ORS 478.010.
APPROPRIATIONS
(State Forestry Department)
SECTION 44.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the State Forestry Department by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2021
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5518), for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2021, for fire protection, is
increased by $10,611,235, for carrying out the provisions of section 30a of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 45. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5518), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds
from the United States Forest Service for fire protection and for research projects,  but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws
2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5518), collected or received by the State Forestry Department, for
fire protection, is increased by $11,514,649, for carrying  out the provisions of section 30a of
this 2021 Act.
SECTION 46. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to  the State Forestry Department by section 1 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5518), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2021, for federal forest resto-
ration, is increased by $27,990,713, for carrying out the provisions of sections 7, 18, 20,  24 and
30a of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 47. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5518), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal  funds
from the United  States Forest Service for fire protection and for research projects, but ex-
cluding lottery  funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5518), collected or received by the State Forestry Department,  for
agency administration, is increased by  $1,467,358, for carrying out the provisions of sections
7, 18, 20 and 30a of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 48. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Forestry Department, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $15,000,000,  for the purpose of offsetting potential increases in
landowner forest  patrol assessments under ORS 477.270 due to the implementation of the
provisions of section 30a of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 49. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to  the State Forestry Department by section 1 (6), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate Bill  5518), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for the equipment pool,
is increased by $474,884, for carrying out the provisions of section 30a of this 2021 Act.
(Public Utility Commission)
Enrolled Senate Bill 762 (SB 762-C) Page 23
SECTION 50. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$324,286 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal  funds, collected or received by the Public Utility
Commission, for carrying out the provisions of sections 2 and 3 of this 2021 Act.
(Department of State Police,
Office of the State Fire Marshal)
SECTION 51. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of State Police by section 1 (1), chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled House Bill 5028), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for  patrol services,
criminal investigations, gaming enforcement and the office of the State Fire  Marshal, is in-
creased by $13,506,889, for carrying out the provisions of sections 8a, 10 and 30b (1) of this
2021 Act.
SECTION 52. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of State Police by section 1 (1), chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled House Bill 5028), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for  patrol services,
criminal investigations, gaming enforcement and the office of the State Fire  Marshal, is in-
creased by $7,000,000, for carrying out the provisions of section 8a (5) of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 53. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of  State Police, office of the State Fire Marshal, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $25,000,000, for deposit in the
Community Risk Reduction Fund established by section 9 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 54. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$25,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department  of State Police, office of the State Fire Marshal,
from the Community Risk Reduction Fund established by section  9 of this 2021 Act for the
purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 8a (6) of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 55. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of State Police by section 1 (1), chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled House Bill 5028), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for  patrol services,
criminal investigations, gaming enforcement and the office of the State Fire  Marshal, is in-
creased by $55,000,000, for carrying out the provisions of section 30b of this 2021  Act that are
related to the Oregon fire mutual aid system.
(Department of Environmental Quality)
SECTION 56. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5516), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2021, for air quality, is
increased by $3,322,828, for carrying out the provisions of  sections 13, 13a and 13b of this 2021
Act.
(Department of Human Services)
SECTION 57. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of  Human Services by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate Bill  5529), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for central services, is
increased by $5,187,411, for carrying out the provisions of  sections 14, 14a and 14b of this 2021
Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 762 (SB 762-C) Page 24
(Oregon Health Authority)
SECTION 58. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2021 (En-
rolled House Bill 5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,  for health systems, health
policy and analytics and public health, is increased by  $4,768,812, for carrying out the pro-
visions of sections 14, 14a, 14b, 15 and 15a of this 2021 Act.
(Oregon Military Department)
SECTION 59. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Military Department  by section 1 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5535), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for  emergency manage-
ment, is increased by $700,003, for carrying out the provisions of section 17 of this 2021 Act.
(Higher Education Coordinating Commission,
Oregon State University)
SECTION 60. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission by section 1 (11), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5528), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for
distribution to public university  statewide programs, is increased by $1,138,040, for distrib-
ution to Oregon State  University for carrying out the provisions of sections 7, 12c and 18 of
this 2021 Act.
SECTION 61.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by  section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5528), for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for Higher
Education Coordinating Commission programs, is increased by $643,668, for carrying out the
provisions of section 22 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 62.
In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000,  for deposit in the Oregon Con-
servation Corps Fund established by section 23 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 63. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Higher Education Coordinating  Commission, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, to  match private donations that
are donated for the purposes of funding grant-supported  projects related to the Oregon
Conservation Corps Program established by section 21 of this 2021 Act.
(Office of the Governor)
SECTION 64. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Office of the  Governor by section 1, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled
Senate Bill 5520), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, is increased by  $497,541, for car-
rying out the provisions of section 35 of this 2021 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 65. The unit captions  used in this 2021 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 762 (SB 762-C) Page 25
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 66. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate June 25, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 762 (SB 762-C) Page 26